apertium-ne-en/apertium-ne-en.en.dix
    <pardef n="t/each__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>each</l>
          <r>each<s n="cat:v"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>each</l>
          <r>each<s n="cat:v"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eachs</l>
          <r>each<s n="cat:v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="per:p3"/><s n="num:s"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aught</l>
          <r>each<s n="cat:v"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aught</l>
          <r>each<s n="cat:v"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaching</l>
          <r>each<s n="cat:v"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="anytghing_just_the_same">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="per:p3"/><s n="num:s"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Mark__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cat:pn"/><s n="ant"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Mary__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cat:pn"/><s n="ant"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="Ram"><i>Ram</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Govind"><i>Govind</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ashok"><i>Ashok</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Sita"><i>Sita</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Gita"><i>Gita</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Rita"><i>Rita</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Kamala"><i>Kamala</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Gopala"><i>Gopal</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Subhiksha"><i>Subhiksha</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Shobha"><i>Shobha</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Hemaraj"><i>Hemaraj</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Yogaraj"><i>Yogaraj</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Samiksha"><i>Samiksha</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Richa"><i>Richa</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Hari"><i>Hari</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="kiss"><i>kiss</i><par n="anytghing_just_the_same"/></e>
    <e lm="crush"><i>crush</i><par n="anytghing_just_the_same"/></e>
    <e lm="finish"><i>finish</i><par n="anytghing_just_the_same"/></e>
    <e lm="harass"><i>harass</i><par n="anytghing_just_the_same"/></e>
